North Dakota, session 69, SB2315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-05.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Lobbyists prohibited from entering legislative chambers - Exception .
An individual required to register under this chapter is prohibited from entering the
chambers of the house of representatives or the senate during a regular or special session of
the legislative assembly unless the individual:
1. Is present in either the balconies of the house of representatives or the senate; or
2. Receives written permission from the majority leader of the chamber to enter the
majority leader's office.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-05.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-05.1-07. Penalty.
Any personAn individual who violates any provisionsprovision of this chapter is guilty of a
class B misdemeanor except that a violation of section 54-05.1-02 or, 54-05.1-03 , or section 1
of this Act is an infraction. Whether a personan individual is subjected to criminal prosecution
under this section, and in addition to the registration fee that may be assessed when the
personindividual submits the registration to the secretary of state, the personindividual may be
assessed a civil penalty by the secretary of state, following written notice to the personindividual
of an intent to assess the penalty, in an amount not to exceed two times the amount set forth in
Page No. 1 25.0593.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
subdivision e of subsection 1 of section 54-05.1-03 which is chargeable to a lobbyist. Any civil
penalty must be assessed and collected before a personan individual is issued a certificate of
registration. The assessment of a civil penalty may be appealed to the district court of the
person'sindividual's county of residence or Burleigh County, but only on the basis that the
secretary of state's administrative determination that the personindividual acted as a lobbyist
when not registered as a lobbyist was clearly erroneous.
Page No. 2 25.0593.03000